District of Columbia statutes.
3-3604

Repealed

License — Application; fees; net capital requirements; bond; renewal.

Repealed.

Aug. 30, 1964, 78 Stat. 625, Pub. L. 88-503, § 5
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-133, § 2(a)-(e), 27 DCR 4417
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(a)(2), 44 DCR 1730
Oct. 26, 2000, D.C. Law 13-203, § 804(a), 47 DCR 7837
1981 Ed., § 2-2604.
1973 Ed., § 2-2404.